verbs.lexc
!This is the FST for Iñapari verbs. This represents syntagmatic properties of word formation by dividing the syntagemes in blocks. The blocks
!called LEXICON represent the paradigmatic elements. So you read it top to bottom left to right.
!This file produce 22656 unique sentences in the language. 

LEXICON Verbs
        Polarity ;

LEXICON Polarity
neg-:aa Verbclass ;
        Verbclass ;

LEXICON Verbclass ! The two basic types of verbs prefixing and non-prefixing
        VPrefixAgr ;
        SIV ;
        
LEXICON VPrefixAgr 
1sg.subj-:%{NO%} Preverbclasses ;
2sg.subj-:%{PI%} Preverbclasses ;
3sg.subj.m-:%{RI%} Preverbclasses ;
3sg.subj.f-:%{RU%} Preverbclasses ;
1pl.subj-:%{AW%} Preverbclasses ;
2/3pl.subj-:i- Preverbclasses ;
              Preverbclasses ; 

LEXICON Preverbclasses !The four verb classes in Iñapari
        TVs ; 
        AIV ;
        IAIV ;
        
LEXICON Mood
 -irr:pari   Tense ;
 -real:      Tense ;

LEXICON Tense 
-nfut.ndef: # ;
-nfut.def:ma # ;
-fut.def:he # ;

LEXICON SuffMood
 -irr:pari   SuffTense ;
 -real:      SuffTense ;

LEXICON SuffTense 
-nfut.ndef: Suffixes;
-nfut.def:ma Suffixes;
-fut.def:he Suffixes;

LEXICON Suffixes
-1sg.obj:no # ;
-2sg.obj:pi # ;
-3sg.obj.m:ri # ;
-3sg.obj.f:ru # ;

! The verb classes are almost working. The prefixes are working, but how do I get TVs to continue past Tense but not the three IV classes? acutally the stative verbs aren't correct either since they only take suffixes and not prefixes
! There are also a lot of ther inflectional and derivational affixes
! Also all of the homophony!This is the FST for Iñapari stative intransitive verbs.      

LEXICON SIV
pu'aníni'a SuffMood ;
potrania SuffMood ;
piture SuffMood ;
panáya'ahea SuffMood ;
nati SuffMood ;
ma SuffMood ;
ina SuffMood ;
iinanima SuffMood ;
amírumára SuffMood ;
itu'a SuffMood ;


!This is the FST for Iñapari transitive verbs.      

LEXICON TVs
ni'a  SuffMood ;
'utara'a SuffMood ;
'upɨ́ɨ́ SuffMood ;
'unu'a SuffMood ;
'une SuffMood ;
'uyari SuffMood ;
'uechi SuffMood ;
'a'a SuffMood ;
'atara'a SuffMood ;
'atapa'ä́ SuffMood ;
'ata SuffMood ;
'apu SuffMood ;
'apata'a SuffMood ;
'apahi'u SuffMood ;
'ayi SuffMood ;
uturu'a SuffMood ;
upɨrɨ́'a SuffMood ;
un'a'a SuffMood ;
unu'a SuffMood ;
una'arita SuffMood ;
una'á SuffMood ;
nuná'ama SuffMood ;
nuná'amari SuffMood ;
una'atiri SuffMood ;
una'ariri SuffMood ;
unamara SuffMood ;
umeá SuffMood ;
umapehera SuffMood ;
tu'uti SuffMood ;
tú'a SuffMood ;
tu'a SuffMood ;
tumi SuffMood ;
tumaa SuffMood ;
tyahi SuffMood ;
tiná SuffMood ;
tiara SuffMood ;
terita'a SuffMood ;
ta'a SuffMood ;
putrani SuffMood ;
piyä SuffMood ;
páhe SuffMood ;
pá SuffMood ;
ni'uru'a SuffMood ;
ni SuffMood ;
na'a SuffMood ;
mina SuffMood ;
mééri'a SuffMood ;
maréta SuffMood ;
yu'ana SuffMood ;
yu'a SuffMood ;
yútáá SuffMood ;
yuruä SuffMood ;
yuputureta SuffMood ;
yuputupira SuffMood ;
yuputu SuffMood ;
yuna SuffMood ;
yui'are SuffMood ;
yúúru SuffMood ;
yawerohɨra SuffMood ;
ya'ata SuffMood ;
yaɨ̈ta SuffMood ;
ɨ'unu'a SuffMood ;
ɨ'une SuffMood ;
ɨ'ahɨ SuffMood ;
ɨuhi SuffMood ;
ɨtɨmatara SuffMood ;
ɨtare'a SuffMood ;
ɨtape'a SuffMood ;
ɨtahɨ SuffMood ;
ɨpúhe SuffMood ;
ɨpuá SuffMood ;
ɨpati SuffMood ;
ɨpana SuffMood ;
ɨnotara SuffMood ;
ɨmu'a SuffMood ;
ɨmɨ̈ɨ̈́ SuffMood ;
ɨmeti SuffMood ;
ɨmé SuffMood ;
ɨmataj̈i SuffMood ;
ɨmataɨ̈hɨ SuffMood ;
ɨɨ̈ra SuffMood ;
ɨhɨé SuffMood ;
ɨaní SuffMood ;
itu'ani SuffMood ;
ichipa SuffMood ;
imenitehi SuffMood ;
iiní'a SuffMood ;
iiniina SuffMood ;
ihɨmaramari SuffMood ;
iara SuffMood ;
i SuffMood ;
hɨperira SuffMood ;
híchi'á SuffMood ;
hipá SuffMood ;
hí SuffMood ;
hana'u SuffMood ;
hamapa SuffMood ;
eta SuffMood ;
epɨma'a SuffMood ;
ehɨmurɨri SuffMood ;
wenita SuffMood ;
a'arapu'a SuffMood ;
a'apenia SuffMood ;
a'apamui'a SuffMood ;
achipiputu SuffMood ;
atora SuffMood ;
atya SuffMood ;
atí SuffMood ;
ata'ahɨ SuffMood ;
ari'a SuffMood ;
apúúta SuffMood  ;
apɨ́ SuffMood ;
apa'a SuffMood ;
apachí SuffMood ;
aparíri SuffMood ;
anina SuffMood ;
ania SuffMood ;
aní SuffMood ;
amuritapi'a SuffMood ;
ameru SuffMood ;
amaná SuffMood ;
ahapú SuffMood ;
ába SuffMood ;
imentehi SuffMood ;
ati SuffMood ;
!This is the FST for Iñapari active intransitive verbs.      

LEXICON AIV
'achiuri Mood ;
'achirí Mood ;
'apɨrana Mood ;
yana Mood ;
tutaa Mood ;
chipara Mood ;
chinú Mood ;
tɨnɨ'a Mood ;
titu Mood ;
pu'ata Mood ;
pururua Mood ;
puä Mood ;
pɨya Mood ;
parína Mood ;
napɨruna Mood ;
mau'a Mood ;
marehɨnenipiya Mood ;
maneta Mood ;
yutána Mood ;
yumaara Mood ;
yúhɨ Mood ;
yati Mood ;
yatimára Mood ;
noyatiMooda Mood ;
ɨʔuri Mood ;
ɨchirína Mood ;
ɨchirihe Mood ;
ɨta'a Mood ;
ɨsu'uhɨra Mood ;
ɨpuná Mood ;
ɨpɨrá Mood ;
ɨpɨpɨhe Mood ;
ɨpɨ Mood ;
ɨpataha Mood ;
ɨ́na Mood ;
ɨmɨti Mood ;
ɨmɨraʔwira Mood ;
ɨmé Mood ;
ɨmataɨra Mood ;
ɨ̈a Mood ;
aβɨaβima Mood ;
i'upititia Mood ;
i'ataa Mood ;
i'ana Mood ;
ituta Mood ;
ichi'a Mood ;
iteyáá Mood ;
ina Mood ;
iiní Mood ;
ihira Mood ;
ɨ̈a Mood ;
aβɨaβima Mood ;
hɨtú Mood ;
hirima Mood ;
a'uti Mood ;
a'ata Mood ;
apunani Mood ;
apa'atanihe'a Mood ;
apaatahe Mood ;


!This is the FST for Iñapari inactive intransitive verbs.      

LEXICON IAIV
'utereta'a Mood ;
'utape Mood ;
'ere'a Mood ;
'atu'a Mood ;
'a Mood ;
'a Mood ;
ya Mood ;
waypaynsihe Mood ;
uchi Mood ;
upuma Mood ;
uaátu Mood ;
te'i Mood ;
tei Mood ;
sihɨ'a Mood ;
see'a Mood ;
rí Mood ;
pu'anania Mood ;
namata'a Mood ;
yapuru Mood ;
yahiru Mood ;
ya Mood ;
ɨwichi'a Mood ;
ɨtumí Mood ;
ɨru'a Mood ;
ɨru Mood ;
ɨpɨturi Mood ;
ɨpa Mood ;
ɨmote Mood ;
ɨmɨ́ Mood ;
ɨmaru Mood ;
ipitisi'ɨra Mood ;
inia Mood ;
imere Mood ;
iyutapɨ'a Mood ;
iɨ Mood ;
iiní Mood ;
iinaní Mood ;
i Mood ;
eʔa Mood ;
etuü'a Mood ;
echiotahe Mood ;
eri'a Mood ;
a'achi'a Mood ;
ati'areri Mood ;
apu Mood ;
apa'a Mood ;
aŋ'a Mood ;
anú Mood ;
anu Mood ;
anu Mood ;
ayú Mood ;
ába'a Mood ;
